Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-905
Register of deeds; recording deed with insufficient tax paid; penalty.

Any register of deeds who shall record any deed upon which a tax is imposed by the provisions of sections 76-901 to 76-907 without collecting the proper amount of tax as required by the provisions of sections 76-901 to 76-907 as is indicated in the declaration appended to such deed shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined the sum of fifty dollars.

Laws 1965, c. 463, § 5, p. 1474.